Ohio, session 136, SB184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 122.634 and 122.635 of the 6
Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 7
Sec. 122.634. The housing accelerator fund is created in 8
the state treasury. The fund shall consist of money appropriated 9
to it by the general assembly and all other money received for 10
the purposes of section 122.635 of the Revised Code. All 11
investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. 12
The director of development shall use the money in the fund only 13
for the purpose of providing grants under section 122.635 of the 14
Revised Code. 15
Sec. 122.635. (A) As used in this section : 16
(1) "Major economic development project" means a project 17
in this state that meets both of the following criteria: 18
(a) The project is reasonably expected to create, retain, 19
and attract jobs or otherwise improve the economic well-being of 20

S. B. No. 184 Page 2
As Introduced
the area surrounding the project site; 21
(b) At least seven hundred million dollars in private 22
investments are committed to establish, expand, renovate, or 23
occupy a facility as part of a single project at a designated 24
project site, including investment in new buildings, additions 25
or improvements to existing buildings, machinery, equipment, 26
furniture, fixtures, and inventory. 27
(2) "Major workforce housing project" means a project that 28
reserves at least one hundred units, designed for residential 29
occupancy by at least one hundred individuals or families living 30
independently from each other. 31
(3) "Pro-housing development policy" may include any of 32
the following: 33
(a) Having a process in place to increase the rate at 34
which permits for housing developments are reviewed; 35
(b) Having a pre-approval process in place for an 36
expedited review of permits for a diverse range of housing 37
developers; 38
(c) Subsidizing or decreasing costs related to water or 39
sewer connections and extensions for major workforce housing 40
projects; 41
(d) Acquiring and readying sites that are ready to be 42
financed and built upon by developers; 43
(e) Reducing or eliminating impact, inspection, and plan 44
review fees for housing developers; 45
(f) Adopting a zoning plan that includes promoting higher 46
density, small lot size, and minimum setback requirements; 47

S. B. No. 184 Page 3
As Introduced
(g) Developing a comprehensive plan that promotes diverse 48
residential development options; 49
(h) Having no or minimal parking requirements for 50
developments that include residential units; 51
(i) Conducting a traffic study, improving water or sewer 52
infrastructure, improving roads, or permitting both rigid and 53
flexible pavement types; 54
(j) Developing partnerships to expand the provision of 55
sewer and water services to new areas; 56
(k) Promoting the use of non-traditional building 57
structures such as modular or manufactured homes. 58
(4) "Residential economic development district" means all 59
parcels of land within a twenty-mile radius of a major economic 60
development project. 61
(B) A county, township, or municipal corporation that is 62
fully or partially located within a residential economic 63
development district may apply for a grant under this section in 64
the form and manner prescribed by the department of development. 65
The county, township, or municipal corporation may submit the 66
application independently or in collaboration with a housing 67
developer or one or more other counties, townships, or municipal 68
corporations. The application shall, at minimum, include 69
documentation or other evidence that proves, to the satisfaction 70
of the department, that the applicant has done or has imminent 71
plans to do both of the following within the district: 72
(1) Adopt and implement pro-housing development policies; 73
(2) Approve a major workforce housing project. 74
(C) The department shall review applications and award 75

S. B. No. 184 Page 4
As Introduced
grants under this section on a rolling basis, to the extent that 76
funds are available. The department shall evaluate applications 77
and determine the amount of each grant awarded in accordance 78
with scoring metrics that give preference to counties, 79
townships, and municipal corporations that: 80
(1) Adopt more pro-housing development policies in terms 81
of both quantity and impact; 82
(2) Allow for higher density, smaller lot size, smaller or 83
no side yard setbacks, and minimal open space. 84
(D) If a county, township, or municipal corporation is 85
approved for a grant under this section based on imminent plans 86
to adopt and implement pro-housing development policies and 87
approve a major workforce housing project, the department shall 88
confirm that the county, township, or municipal corporation 89
follows through with those plans, as described in the grant 90
application, before disbursing grant funds. A grant recipient 91
shall use the funds only for the following purposes: 92
(1) Providing capital for housing development through 93
grants or loans; 94
(2) Acquiring and readying sites for development; 95
(3) Providing financial assistance for housing-related 96
infrastructure projects including road improvements and water or 97
sewer connections; 98
(4) Addressing additional service or public safety needs 99
due to increases in population; 100
(5) Any other purpose deemed appropriate by the director 101
of development. 102
(E) The director of development shall adopt rules in 103

S. B. No. 184 Page 5
As Introduced
accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement 104
and administer this section. The rules shall address application 105
procedures, scoring metrics, grant distribution, and state model 106
zoning plans that include density, lot size, and setback 107
preferences. 108
(F) The general assembly, in enacting this section, hereby 109
declares its intent to encourage major workforce housing 110
projects in areas of the state that otherwise would not attract 111
such developments and to increase home ownership among Ohioans. 112